Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-340
Discrimination
against person refusing to participate in an abortion; damages.

Any person whose employment or position has been in any way
altered, impaired, or terminated in violation of sections 28-325 to 28-345
may sue in the district court for all consequential damages, lost wages, reasonable
attorney's fees incurred, and the cost of litigation.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 55;

Laws 1997, LB 23, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB594, § 15.